Missouri, session 2026, HB1686.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 230.205, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 230.205, to read as follows:
230.205. 1. The alternative county highway commission provided by sections
230.200 to 230.260 shall not become operative in any county unless adopted by a vote of the
majority of the voters of the county voting upon the question at an election. All counties of
this state which have adopted the alternative county highway commission may abolish it [and
return to the county highway commission provided for by sections 230.010 to 230.110] by
submitting the question to a vote of the voters of the county in the manner provided by law or
by a vote of the governing body.
2. Any county which does not adopt the alternative county highway commission
provided by sections 230.200 to 230.260, or any county in which [a majority of the voters of
the county voting upon the question reject] the alternative county highway commission
provided by sections 230.200 to 230.260 is abolished, shall [retain] adopt either the county
highway commission provided by sections 230.010 to 230.110 or the provisions of sections
231.010 to 231.130.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.